Hawaii statutes.
§666-11 Judgment; writ of possession. [Repeal
and reenactment on June 30, 2020. L 2015, c 101, §4.] If it is proved to
the satisfaction of the court that the plaintiff is entitled to the possession
of the premises, the plaintiff shall have judgment for possession, and for the
plaintiff's costs. Execution shall issue accordingly. The writ of possession
shall issue to the sheriff, deputy sheriff, police officer, or independent
civil process server from the department of public safety's list under section
353C-10, commanding the sheriff, deputy sheriff, police officer, or independent
civil process server to remove all persons from the premises, and to put the
plaintiff, or the plaintiff's agent, into the full possession thereof. [CC
1859, §943; RL 1925, §2784; RL 1935, §4021; RL 1945, §10410; RL 1955, §240-11;
am L 1963, c 85, §3; HRS §666-11; am L 1972, c 90, §8(f); gen ch 1985; am L
1989, c 211, §10; am L 1990, c 281, §11; am L 2012, c 142, §10; am L 2013, c
116, §§18, 25(17)]

Case Notes

Defendant cannot be defaulted if defendant appears without
filing written pleadings. 14 H. 590 (1903).

Writ may issue at any time after judgment unless stayed by
law. 23 H. 65 (1915).

Appeal as a supersedeas. 27 H. 308, 321-322 (1923); 27 H.
362, 367 (1923).

Issuance of writ does not deprive defendants of right of
appeal. 27 H. 362, 366 (1923).

Cited: 19 H. 65, 67 (1908); 20 H. 712, 713 (1911).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next